New York, session 2025-2026, A112.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3403 of the insurance law is REPEALED. 2 § 2. The superintendent of financial services shall repeal all rules 3 and regulations which implement the provisions of section 3403 of the 4 insurance law. 5 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00821-01-5